Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.190

Notarial acts on electronic records—Technology—Notification—Standards.

(1) A notary public may not perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records unless the notary public holds a commission as an electronic records notary public.

(2) An electronic records notary public may select one or more tamper-evident technologies to perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records that meet the standards provided in subsection (4) of this section. A person cannot require an electronic records notary public to perform a notarial act with respect to an electronic record with a technology that the notary public has not selected.

(3) Before an electronic records notary public performs the notary public's initial notarial act with respect to an electronic record, an electronic records notary public shall notify the department that he or she will be performing notarial acts with respect to electronic records and identify the technology the electronic records notary public intends to use.

(4) The director shall establish standards for approval of technology in rule. If the technology conforms to the standards, the director shall approve the use of the technology.

[ 2017 c 281 s 21.]